test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_vaso_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - taho: # ok TAHO
    taho+N+Sg+Nom:  taˊho
    taho+N+Sg+Gen:  taˊṿo
    taho+N+Sg+Acc:  taˊṿo
    taho+N+Sg+Ill:  taˊhonte	
    taho+N+Sg+Loc:  tavvoost
    taho+N+Sg+Com:  taˊṿoin
    taho+N+Sg+Abe:  taˊṿottáá
    taho+N+Ess:  tahhoon
    taho+N+Par: tahhood
    taho+N+Pl+Nom:  taˊṿoh
    taho+N+Pl+Gen:  taˊṿoi
    taho+N+Pl+Acc:  taˊṿoid
    taho+N+Pl+Ill:  tavvoid
    taho+N+Pl+Loc:  taˊṿoin
    taho+N+Pl+Com:  taˊṿoiguin
    taho+N+Pl+Abe:  taˊṿoittáá

  Noun - vašo: #
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom:  vaˊṣ̌o
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen:  vaˊšo
    vašo+N+Sg+Acc:  vaˊšo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill:  vaˊṣ̌on
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaššoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com:  vaˊšoin
    vašo+N+Sg+Abe:  vaˊšottáá
    vašo+N+Ess:  vaššoon
    vašo+N+Par: vaššood 
    vašo+N+Pl+Nom:  vaˊšoh
    vašo+N+Pl+Gen:  vaˊšoi
    vašo+N+Pl+Acc:  vaˊšoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Ill:  vaˊšoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Loc:  vaˊšoin
    vašo+N+Pl+Com:  vaˊšoiguin
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe:  vaˊšoittáá
